Alaska, session 34, SB7.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 11.81.370 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 05 (d) A peace officer may not knowingly use a carotid restraint, tracheal choke, 06 or other restraint that impedes another person's breathing or circulation of blood in a 07 manner likely to produce a loss of consciousness except in situations for which deadly 08 force is authorized by law. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.